Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1450.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 180.14 of Title 17, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Legislature hereby establishes a moratorium on
the construction or expansion of any new or existing wind or
utility-scale solar energy facilities in this state pursuant to the
provisions of this act. Unless otherwise repealed or revoked by the
Oklahoma Legislature, the moratorium shall be in effect indefinitely
beginning upon the passage and approval of this act.
B. Subject to the moratorium set by subsection A of this
section, no state agency, authority, board, commission, committee,
Req. No. 11005 Page 1

depa rtment, trust or other instrumentality of this state or
political subdivision thereof, nor elected or appointed officer,
member of any governing body or other person designated to act for
an agency or on behalf of the state, or a political subdivision
thereof, shall permit the construction or expansion of wind or
utility-scale solar energy facilities in this state.
C. Nothing in this section shall be construed as affecting or
intending to affect:
1. Any construction or expansion of wind or utility-scale solar
energy facilities in this state that were properly permitted for
construction or expansion and that have obtained official approval
from the Regional Transmission Organization and are commercially
operable prior to the passage and approval of this act; or
2. The operation of wind or utility-scale solar energy
facilities in operation prior to the passage and approval of this
act.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-11005 JBH 01/03/25


Req. No. 11005 Page 2